Utah statutes.
78B-6-1205.   Summons -- To whom directed.
The summons shall be directed to:
(1)  all joint tenants;
(2)  tenants in common of all persons having any interest in, or recorded
liens upon the property or any portion of the property; and
(3)  any other person claiming any interest in the property.
